Washington statutes.
RCW 36.56.050

Employees and personnel.

All employees and personnel of the metropolitan municipal corporation who are under a personnel system pursuant to RCW 35.58.370 shall be assigned to the county personnel system to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing the county personnel system.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 277 s 5.]